Utah statutes.
75-3-813.   Compromise of claims.

When a claim against the estate has been presented in any manner, the personal representative may, if it appears for the best interest of the estate, compromise the claim, whether due or not due, absolute or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

